North Carolina, session 2025, SB866.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-562.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Authority. – The State Education Assistance Authority.
(2) Division. – The Division of Nonpublic Education, Department of
Administration.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2023-134, s. 8A.6(a), effective July 1, 2023.
(3a) Eligible student. – A student residing in North Carolina who has not yet
received a high school diploma and who meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Is eligible to attend a North Carolina public school pursuant to Article
25 of this Chapter. A child who is the age of 4 on or before April 16 is
eligible to attend the following school year if the principal, or
equivalent, of the school in which the child seeks to enroll finds that
the student meets the requirements established by the Authority
pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.2(d) and those findings are submitted to the
Authority.
b. Has not been enrolled in a postsecondary institution as a full-time
student taking at least 12 hours of academic credit.
c. Has not been placed in a nonpublic school or facility by a public
agency at public expense.
(3c) Repealed by Session Laws 2023-134, s. 8A.6(a), effective July 1, 2023.
(3d) Home school. – A nonpublic school that meets the requirements of Part 3 of
Article 39 of this Chapter as identified by the Division.
(4) Local school administrative unit. – A local school administrative unit, charter
school, or regional school.
(5) Nonpublic school. – A school that meets the requirements of Part 1 or Part 2
Part 1, Part 2, or Part 3 of this Article as identified by the Division.
(5c) Repealed by Session Laws 2023-134, s. 8A.6(a), effective July 1, 2023.
(5d) Private school. – A school that meets the requirements of Part 1 or Part 2 of
this Article as identified by the Division.
*S866-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5e) Reserve. – The Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve established
under G.S. 115C-562.8.
(6) Scholarship grants. – Grants awarded annually by the Authority to eligible
students."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-562.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.2. Scholarship grants.
(a) The Authority shall make available no later than February 1 annually applications to
eligible students for the award of scholarship grants to attend any nonpublic school on a full- or
part-time basis. Information about scholarship grants and the application process shall be made
available on the Authority's website. Beginning March 15, the Authority shall begin awarding
scholarship grants to students who have applied by March 1 in the following order:
(1) Eligible students who received a scholarship grant for the school year prior to
the school year for which the students are applying.
(2) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (1) of subsection (b2) of this section.residing in households
with an income level not in excess of the amount required for the student to
qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch program.
(3) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (2) of subsection (b2) of this section.residing in households
with an income level between the amount required for the student to qualify
for the federal free or reduced-price lunch program and not in excess of two
hundred percent (200%) of that amount.
(4) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (3) of subsection (b2) of this section.residing in households
with an income level of between two hundred percent (200%) of the amount
required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch
program and not in excess of four hundred fifty percent (450%) of that
amount.
(5) All other students.
…
(b2) Scholarship grants shall be awarded to eligible students as follows:
(1) For students enrolled in private schools:
(1)a. For students residing in households with an income level not in excess
of the amount required for the student to qualify for the federal free or
reduced-price lunch program, per year per eligible student, an amount
of up to one hundred percent (100%) of the average State per pupil
allocation for average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(2)b. For students residing in households with an income level between the
amount required for the student to qualify for the federal free or
reduced-price lunch program and not in excess of two hundred percent
(200%) of that amount, per year per eligible student, an amount of up
to ninety percent (90%) of the average State per pupil allocation for
average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(3)c. For students residing in households with an income level of between
two hundred percent (200%) of the amount required for the student to
qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch program and not in
excess of four hundred fifty percent (450%) of that amount, per year
per eligible student, an amount of up to sixty percent (60%) of the
average State per pupil allocation for average daily membership in the
prior fiscal year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 866-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4)d. For all students, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to
forty-five percent (45%) of the average State per pupil allocation for
average daily membership in the prior fiscal year, unless the student
qualifies for a higher amount under this subsection.
(2) For students enrolled in home schools, per year per eligible student, the sum
of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).
(b3) Tuition Scholarship grant funds may be used for tuition and fees for a nonpublic
school of a private school and required costs of a home school. Tuition and fees of a private
school may include tuition and fees for books, transportation, equipment, or other items required
by the nonpublic private school. Required costs of a home school include costs for books,
equipment, and other required items but do not include tuition, fees, or transportation.
(b4) No scholarship grant shall exceed, per year per eligible student, an amount equal to
one hundred percent (100%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year, and year. For students in private school, no scholarship grant
shall exceed the required tuition and fees for the nonpublic school the eligible student will attend.
…."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-562.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.4. Identification of nonpublic schools and distribution of scholarship grant
information.
(a) The Division shall provide annually by December 31 to the Authority a list of all
nonpublic schools operating in the State that meet both of the requirements of Part 1 or Part 2 of
this Article and State and all nonpublic schools operating in the State that meet the requirements
of G.S. 115C-562.5(a)(8). The Division shall notify the Authority of any schools included in the
list that the Division has determined to be ineligible within five business days of the
determination of ineligibility. The Division shall create, in collaboration with the Authority, a
unique identifier for each nonpublic school and provide the unique identifiers to the Authority
for all nonpublic schools that are registered with the Division.
…."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-562.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.5. Obligations of nonpublic schools accepting eligible students receiving
scholarship grants.
(a) A nonpublic private school that accepts eligible students receiving scholarship grants
shall comply with the following:
…
(4) Administer, at least once in each school year, tests as provided in this
subdivision. Test performance data shall be submitted to the Authority by July
15 of each year. Test performance data reported to the Authority under this
subdivision is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.
Tests shall be administered to all eligible students enrolled in grades three and
higher whose tuition and fees are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship
grant as follows:
a. The nationally standardized test designated by the Authority in grades
three and eight.
b. The ACT in grade 11.
c. A nationally standardized test or other nationally standardized
equivalent measurement selected by the chief administrative officer of
the nonpublic school private school in all other grades four and higher.
For grades four through seven, the nationally standardized test or other
equivalent measurement selected must measure achievement in the
areas of English grammar, reading, spelling, and mathematics. For
grades nine, 10, and 12, the nationally standardized test or other
Senate Bill 866-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
equivalent measurement selected must measure either (i) achievement
in the areas of English grammar, reading, spelling, and mathematics
or (ii) competencies in the verbal and quantitative areas.
…
(b) A nonpublic private school that accepts students receiving scholarship grants shall
not require any additional fees based on the status of the student as a scholarship grant recipient.
(c) A nonpublic private school enrolling more than 25 students in any grade whose tuition
and fees are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship grant shall provide and retain information
on student test performance in each grade with more than 25 students, as follows:
(1) Report to the Authority on the aggregate standardized test performance of
eligible students in grades three, eight, and 11. Aggregate test performance
data reported to the Authority which does not contain personally identifiable
student data shall be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.
Test performance data may be shared with public or private institutions of
higher education located in North Carolina and shall be provided to an
independent research organization selected by the Authority for research
purposes as permitted by the Federal Education Rights and Privacy Act, 20
U.S.C. § 1232g.
(2) Retain standardized test performance data for eligible students in all other
grades and annually certify to the Authority compliance with the requirements
of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section.
(c1) A nonpublic private school shall not discriminate with respect to the categories listed
in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d, as that statute read on January 1, 2014.
(c2) A home school that accepts students receiving scholarship grants shall comply with
the requirements of Part 3 of this Article.
(d) If the Authority determines that a nonpublic school is not in compliance with the
requirements of this section, the nonpublic school shall be ineligible to receive future scholarship
funds. The nonpublic A private school shall notify the parent or guardian of any enrolled student
receiving a scholarship grant that the nonpublic private school is no longer eligible to receive
future scholarship grants. The Authority shall establish by rule a process for a nonpublic school
to appeal for reconsideration of eligibility after one year. To ensure compliance, the Board of
Directors of the Authority shall review the criminal history provided under subdivision (2) of
subsection (a) of this section to ensure that the person has not been convicted of any crime listed
in G.S. 115C-332. The Board shall determine through this review whether the nonpublic private
school is noncompliant with this section. The Board shall make written findings with regard to
how the criminal history information was used when making the compliance determination. The
Board of Directors may delegate any of the duties in this subsection to the Executive Director of
the Authority. As part of its review, the Board shall determine whether the results indicate that
the staff member has any of the following disqualifying characteristics:
(1) Poses a threat to the physical safety of students or personnel.
(2) Demonstrates that he or she does not have the integrity or honesty to fulfill his
or her duties in overseeing State funds and the requirements of the scholarship
grant program.
(3) Has not fully satisfied the criminal sentencing obligations imposed following
his or her conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(e) If a nonpublic school terminates operation during the school's regular schedule and
fails to (i) report the date of the closure to the Division within 14 days and (ii) return funds owed
to the Authority in a timely manner for students who received scholarship grants, any other
nonpublic school opened during that school year or subsequent school years by an owner or chief
administrator owner, chief administrator, or parent listed in the report submitted to the Division
under subdivision (8) of subsection (a) of this section for that closed school shall be ineligible to
Page 4 Senate Bill 866-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
receive scholarship grants until such time the Authority determines the obligation to return those
funds has been satisfied."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 115C-562.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.6. Scholarship endorsement.
The Authority shall remit, at least two times each school year, scholarship grant funds
awarded to eligible students to the nonpublic school school. Scholarship grant funds awarded to
eligible students to a private school shall be remitted for endorsement by at least one of the
student's parents or guardians. The parent or guardian shall restrictively endorse the scholarship
grant funds awarded to the eligible student for deposit into the account of the nonpublic private
school to the credit of the eligible student. The parent or guardian shall not designate any entity
or individual associated with the nonpublic private school as the parent's attorney-in-fact to
endorse the scholarship grant funds. A parent's or guardian's failure to comply with this section
shall result in forfeit of the scholarship grant. A scholarship grant forfeited for failure to comply
with this section shall be returned to the Authority to be awarded to another student."
SECTION 2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Opportunity
Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve the sum of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) in
additional recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-562.8(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical need in this State to provide
opportunity for school choice for North Carolina students, it is imperative that the State provide
an increase of funds for 15 years to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve. Therefore,
there is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve the following amounts for each fiscal
year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
…
2027-2028 $700,000,000$950,000,000
2028-2029 $725,000,000$975,000,000
2029-2030 $750,000,000$1,000,000,000
2030-2031 $775,000,000$1,025,000,000
2031-2032 $800,000,000$1,050,000,000
For the 2032-2033 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Reserve the sum of eight hundred twenty-five million dollars ($825,000,000)
one billion seventy-five million dollars ($1,075,000,000) to be used for the purposes set forth in
this section. When developing the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for each fiscal year
specified in this subsection, the Director of the Budget shall include the appropriated amount
specified in this subsection for that fiscal year."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to applications
for scholarship grants beginning with the 2027-2028 school year.
Senate Bill 866-First Edition Page 5